New Jersey, session 221, S725.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this act: Dwelling means a structure or part thereof that is designed or intended for occupancy as a residence or sleeping place. Forcibly enters means an entry involving an act of physical force resulting in damage to the structure; or the changing or manipulation of a lock to gain access. b.  A person who forcibly enters an uninhabited or vacant dwelling knowing or having reason to believe that such entry is without permission of the owner of the dwelling or an authorized representative of the owner, with the intent to take up residence or provide a residency to another therein, is guilty of housebreaking. A person is presumed to know that an entry described in subsection b. of this section is without the permission of the owner of the dwelling or an authorized representative of the owner unless the person provides a written rental agreement that: (1)  Is notarized or signed by an authorized agent of the owner; and (2)  Includes the current address and telephone number of the owner or the owners authorized representative. c.  Housebreaking is a crime of the fourth degree. 2.  a.  A person who takes up residence in an uninhabited or vacant dwelling and knows or has reason to believe that such residency is without permission of the owner of the dwelling or an authorized representative of the owner is guilty of unlawful occupancy. b.  A person is presumed to know that the residency described in subsection a. of this section is without the permission of the owner of the dwelling or an authorized representative of the owner unless the person provides a written rental agreement that: (1)  Is notarized or signed by an authorized agent of the owner; and (2)  Includes the current address and telephone number of the owner or the owners authorized representative. c. Unlawful occupancy is a crime of the fourth degree. 3.  A person commits unlawful reentry, a crime of the fourth degree, if: a.  An owner of real property has recovered possession of the property from the person pursuant to court order; and b.  Without the authority of the court or permission of the owner, the person reenters the property. 4.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month following enactment.